test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-A-1-kwâpahikan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/fst/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/fst/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Lemma - kwâpahikan :

      # Core

      # Nonposs
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Sg: kwâpahikan #  a ladle, a dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Pl: kwâpahikanak   #  ladles, dippers
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Obv: kwâpahikana   #  an/other ladle(s), an/other dipper(s)

      # Poss
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikwâpahikan   #  my ladle, my dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: okwâpahikana   #  his/her other ladle(s), his/her other dipper(s)
      

      # Nonposs
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Sg: kwâpahikan   #  a ladle, a dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Pl: kwâpahikanak   #  ladles, dippers
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Obv: kwâpahikana   #  an/other ladle(s), an/other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Distr: kwâpahikaninâhk   #  among ladles, among dippers
      

      # Der/Dim
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [kwâpahikanis, kwâpahikanisîs]   #  a little ladle, a little dipper
      

      # Poss # Sg
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nikwâpahikan   #  my ladle, my dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kikwâpahikan   #  your ladle, your dipper
      
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nikwâpahikaninân   #  our ladle, our dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kikwâpahikaninaw   #  your and our ladle, your and our dipper
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kikwâpahikaniwâw   #  your ladle, your dipper
      
      
      

      # Poss # Pl
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nikwâpahikanak   #  my ladles, my dippers
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kikwâpahikanak   #  your ladles, your dippers
      
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nikwâpahikaninânak   #  our ladles, our dippers
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kikwâpahikaninawak   #  your and our ladles, your and our dippers
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kikwâpahikaniwâwak   #  your ladles, your dippers
      
      
      

      # Poss # Obv
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: nikwâpahikana   #  my other ladle(s), my other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: kikwâpahikana   #  your other ladle(s), your other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: okwâpahikana   #  his/her other ladle(s), his/her other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: nikwâpahikaninâna   #  our other ladle(s), our other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: kikwâpahikaninawa   #  your and our other ladle(s), your and our other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: kikwâpahikaniwâwa   #  your other ladle(s), your other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: okwâpahikaniwâwa   #  their other ladle(s), their other dipper(s)
      kwâpahikan+N+A+Px4Sg/Pl+Obv: okwâpahikanithiwa   #  another's/others' other ladle(s), another's/others' other dipper(s)
      
